Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7 Hazardous Substances
8-7-505. Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person:

To violate any provision of this subchapter or any rule adopted under this subchapter;

To knowingly make a false statement, representation, or certification in any report or other document filed or required by this subchapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter; or

To violate any order issued by the Division of Environmental Quality under this subchapter or any provision of such an order.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4721; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 631; 2019, No. 910, § 2753.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “or regulation” following “rule” in (1); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (3).

8-7-506. Rules — Administrative procedure.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission shall adopt rules under this subchapter necessary to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, rules affording any persons aggrieved by any order issued pursuant to this subchapter an opportunity for a hearing thereon and commission review of the action.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4724; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 632.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in the section heading and twice in the section.

Cross References.

Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, hearings, § 8-4-212.

8-7-507. Compliance of federal and state entities.

Each department, agency, or instrumentality of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of the United States Government and the state government shall be subject to and comply with this subchapter in the same manner and to the same extent, both procedurally and substantively, as any nongovernmental entity, including liability under this section.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4719.

8-7-508. Remedial and removal authority of the division.

Upon finding that a hazardous substance site exists or may exist, the Division of Environmental Quality, upon reasonable notice and after opportunity for hearing, may issue an order to any person liable for the site under § 8-7-512 if that person has caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of hazardous substances at the hazardous substance site. This order shall require that such remedial actions be taken as are necessary to investigate, control, prevent, abate, treat, or contain any releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances from the hazardous substance site.

The fact that such a hazardous substance site is or is not listed by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission pursuant to § 8-7-509(f) shall in no manner limit the authority of the division under this subchapter.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or any employee or authorized agent of the division may enter upon any private or public property for the purpose of collecting information under this subchapter and for initiating and implementing remedial actions.

The director is authorized to initiate and implement remedial actions under this subchapter pursuant to the provisions of § 8-7-509.

In taking removal action or remedial actions pursuant to this subchapter, the division or any contractor of the division under this section shall not be required to obtain any state or local permit for the portion of any removal action or remedial action conducted pursuant to this subchapter entirely on site when the removal action or remedial action is otherwise carried out in compliance with the rules of the division.

The director is authorized to initiate and implement removal actions under this subchapter whenever there is a release or a threatened release of hazardous substances which may present an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare or to the environment.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a release or threatened release of hazardous substances may present an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare or to the environment, the director and the employees and the authorized representatives of the division shall have the right to enter upon any affected private or public property for the purpose of collecting information and for initiating and implementing appropriate removal or remedial actions.

Removal actions are not authorized when the director has reasonable assurance that the person liable for a release or threatened release has committed to and is capable of initiating corrective and removal action in a timely manner and that the actions will achieve results equivalent to the results from removal action authorized in this section.

Upon finding that a release or a threatened release of hazardous substances may present an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare or to the environment, the director, without notice or hearing, may issue an order reciting the existence of such an imminent hazard and substantial endangerment and requiring that such removal actions be taken as he or she determines necessary to protect the health and safety of any affected or threatened persons or the environment and to otherwise meet the emergency.

The order of the director issued under subsection (h) of this section may include, but is not limited to, requiring any person responsible in whole or in part for the release or threatened release or any person in total or partial control of the site, facility, or transport vehicle from which the release or threatened release emanates, if that person has caused or contributed to the release or threatened release, to take such steps as are necessary to protect the public health and safety and the environment.

The director is not authorized to expend in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) on any single removal action without approval of the commission.

The orders issued under subsection (h) of this section may be issued verbally or in writing.

If originally issued verbally, a written order shall be issued by the director confirming the verbal order as soon as it is reasonably possible to do so.

Any person to whom an order issued under subsection (h) of this section is directed shall comply with the order immediately but, upon written request to the commission within ten (10) days of the order's being issued by the director, shall be afforded a hearing and administrative review of the order within ten (10) days after filing the written request.

A person shall not be deemed to be liable for, responsible for, or to have caused or contributed to the release or threatened release of hazardous substances pursuant to any provision of this subchapter if the person merely provides financing or loans to another person or obtains title to property through foreclosure or through conveyance of property in total or partial satisfaction of a mortgage or other security interest in property.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4717; Acts 1987, No. 761, § 3; 1989, No. 260, § 4; 2005, No. 1824, § 9; 2019, No. 315, § 633; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2754-2757.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (b); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-509. Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund.

The Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund is created.

The Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund will be administered by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, who shall authorize expenditures from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund.

The Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund shall consist of all moneys received as penalties under §§ 8-4-101 — 8-4-106, 8-4-201 — 8-4-229, 8-4-301 — 8-4-313, 8-6-201 — 8-6-214, 8-7-201 — 8-7-226, 8-7-504, and § 20-27-1001 et seq.

In addition to all moneys appropriated by the General Assembly to the fund, there shall be deposited into the fund:

Any moneys received by the state as a gift or donation to the fund;

All interest earned upon moneys deposited into the fund;

All fees assessed under § 8-7-518;

All punitive damages collected pursuant to § 8-7-517; and

Any other moneys legally designated for the fund.

In addition, there is authorized to be deposited into the fund all moneys recovered pursuant to § 8-7-514 and all moneys received as penalties pursuant to § 8-7-504.

Ten percent (10%) of the moneys collected for the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund after July 1, 1991, shall be deposited into the Environmental Education Fund. Total deposit of funds shall not exceed two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000) per fiscal year.

Ten percent (10%) of the moneys collected for the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund after July 1, 2017, may be used for conducting site assessments of potentially contaminated sites when a letter of intent has been signed and available federal funds are exhausted in accordance with § 8-7-1101 et seq.

This amount shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per fiscal year.

The remaining moneys in the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund may be expended by the director as authorized by this subsection and subsection (e) of this section:

For the costs and expenses reasonably necessary for the administration of this subchapter by the Division of Environmental Quality;

For the state share mandated by § 104(c)(3) of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. § 9604(c)(3); and

To provide for the investigation, identification, assessment, containment, abatement, treatment, or control, including monitoring and maintenance, of hazardous substance sites within the state. The director may enter into the contracts and use the funds for those purposes directly associated with identification, investigation, containment, abatement, treatment, or control, including monitoring and maintenance, prescribed above, including:

Hiring of personnel;

Purchasing, leasing, or renting of equipment; and

Other necessary expenses related to the operation and implementation of this subchapter.

The moneys in the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund may be expended by the director for removal actions, including:

The purchase of any commodities or services necessary in taking removal actions in connection with a release or threatened release; and

Reimbursement of all costs incurred by the division in taking removal actions in connection with a release or threatened release.

No expenditures from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund, as authorized by subdivisions (d)(3)(B) and (C) of this section, shall be made prior to the approval by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission of a prioritized listing of hazardous substance sites at which remedial actions are authorized through the use of Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund moneys. This listing shall be revised annually by the division and submitted to the commission for approval after public notice and opportunity for hearing.

Upon a showing that a release of a hazardous substance at a hazardous substance site exists and will continue without expeditious remedial action, the commission may list the site on the prioritized listing pursuant to the procedures set out in § 8-4-202(e) prior to public notice and thereby authorize the director to expend funds pursuant to subdivision (d)(3)(C) of this section. Such an emergency listing need not be supported by a factual showing of irreparable harm or imminent and substantial endangerment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 19-6-108 and 19-6-601, grants to the state under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., and the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act, Pub. L. No. 96-510, as each may be amended from time to time, and otherwise from the United States Environmental Protection Agency received by the Treasurer of State from the United States Government are declared to be cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated and are to be used solely as authorized in this subchapter and the Arkansas Brownfield Revolving Loan Fund Act, § 15-5-1501 et seq.

When received by the Treasurer of State, the cash funds shall not be deposited into or deemed to be a part of the State Treasury for the purposes of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29, Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 12, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20, or any other constitutional or statutory provisions.

The Treasurer of State shall pay the cash funds to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority for deposit into the Brownfield Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to the Arkansas Brownfield Revolving Loan Fund Act, § 15-5-1501 et seq., to be used for the purposes authorized by this subchapter and the Arkansas Brownfield Revolving Loan Fund Act, § 15-5-1501 et seq.

Such federal grants transferred directly to the authority are declared to be cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated and to be used solely as authorized in this subchapter and the Arkansas Brownfield Revolving Loan Fund Act, § 15-5-1501 et seq.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, §§ 4, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-4715, 82-4716; Acts 1991, No. 746, § 2; 1991, No. 786, § 9; 1997, No. 1042, §§ 4, 5; 1999, No. 45, § 1; 2005, No. 1824, § 10; 2011, No. 1011, § 3; 2017, No. 1073, § 3; 2019, No. 693, § 20; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2758-2761.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The Emergency Response Fund, referred to in this section, was abolished by Acts 2005, No. 1824, §§ 4 and 18.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted “8-4-401 et seq.” following “8-4-313” in (c)(2).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (d) as (d)(1) and (d)(3); inserted present (d)(2); and inserted “assessment” in present (d)(3)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted former (c)(1) and (c)(3)(D) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions in (c) accordingly; deleted “Beginning July 1, 2005” from the beginning of present (c)(1); and substituted “fund” for “Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund” throughout (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b) and (d)(3)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (e)(2) and (f)(1).

U.S. Code.

The Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980 is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq.

Cross References.

Environmental Education Fund, § 19-5-1027.

Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund, § 19-5-930.

8-7-510. Federal actions or compensation not to be duplicated.

No actions taken pursuant to this subchapter by the Division of Environmental Quality shall duplicate federal actions, and no claims for the costs of response or other claims compensable under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510, shall be compensable under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4716; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2762.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-511. Furnishing of information.

For purposes of assisting in determining the need for remedial action in connection with a release or threat of release of hazardous substances under this subchapter or for enforcing the provisions of this subchapter, any person who stores, treats, or disposes of hazardous substances, or, if necessary to ascertain facts not available at the site or facility where the hazardous substances are stored, treated, or disposed of, any person who generates, transports, otherwise handles, or has handled hazardous substances shall, upon request of any officer or employee of the Division of Environmental Quality, furnish information relating to the hazardous substance and permit the person at all reasonable times to have access to and copy all records relating to the hazardous substances and to inspect and obtain samples of any such hazardous substances or other materials.

However, any information which would constitute a trade secret under § 4-75-601 et seq., obtained by the Department of Energy and Environment, the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, the division, or any employees of the Department of Energy and Environment or the division, in the administration of this subchapter, except emission data, shall be kept confidential.

Any violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4723; Acts 2019, No. 693, § 21; 2019, No. 910, § 2763.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “is a Class A” for “shall be unlawful and constitute a” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and, in (b), substituted “Department of Energy and Environment, the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, the division, or any employees of the Department of Energy and Environment or the division” for “department or its employees”.

Cross References.

Misdemeanors, § 5-1-107.

8-7-512. Liability for costs — Immunity from liability.

Any of the following shall be liable to the state for all costs of remedial action or removal actions under this subchapter:

The owner and operator of a facility;

Any person who, at the time of disposal of any hazardous substance, owned or operated a hazardous substance site;

Any generator of hazardous substances who caused such a hazardous substance to be disposed of at a hazardous substance site or who causes a release or threatened release of the hazardous substances; or

Any transporter of hazardous substances who causes a release or threatened release of the hazardous substances or who selected a hazardous substance site for disposal of the hazardous substances.

No person shall be liable under this subchapter for damages as a result of actions taken or omitted in the course of rendering care, assistance, or advice at the direction of the Department of Energy and Environment, the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, or the Division of Environmental Quality, with respect to an incident creating a danger to public health or welfare or the environment as a result of any release of a hazardous substance or the threat of a release of a hazardous substance.

This subsection shall not preclude liability for damages as a result of gross negligence or intentional misconduct on the part of the person, nor shall this subsection preclude liability for damages and costs of remedial action or removal action of any person liable for such damages and costs pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

For the purposes of subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, reckless, willful, or wanton misconduct shall constitute gross negligence.

A person taking remedial action or removal action under this subchapter as a contractor for the department or division shall not be liable under this subchapter or under any other state law to any person for injuries, costs, damages, expenses, or other liability, including, but not limited to, claims for indemnification or contribution and claims by third parties for death, personal injury, illness, loss of or damage to property, or economic loss resulting from a release or threatened release of hazardous substances.

However, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply in case of a release that is caused by the conduct of the person taking remedial action or removal action that is negligent or grossly negligent or which constitutes intentional misconduct.

A state employee or an employee of a political subdivision who provides services relating to remedial action or removal action while acting within the scope of his or her authority as a governmental employee shall have the same exemption from liability, subject to the other provisions of this section, as is provided to the removal action or remediation action contractor under subsection (c) of this section.

Nothing in subsection (c) or subsection (d) of this section shall affect the liability of any person under warranty under state or common law.

Nothing in this subsection shall affect the liability of an employer taking remedial action or removal action to any employee of any such employer under any provision of law, including any provision of any law relating to workers' compensation.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4719; Acts 1987, No. 761, § 4; 1989, No. 441, § 2; 2005, No. 1824, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2764, 2765.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Energy and Environment, the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, or the Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1); and inserted “or division” in (c)(1).

Cross References.

Civil liability of those assisting at accidents, § 8-7-101.

Donation of property or equipment, immunity, § 12-75-125.

Emergency Management Assistance Compact, § 12-76-201 et seq.

Emergency responders, immunities and exemptions, § 12-75-128.

Exemption for requested assistance, § 16-120-401.

Good Samaritan law, § 17-95-101.

Immunity of state officers and employees — Status as employee, § 19-10-305.

Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, § 12-76-101 et seq.

Limitations on civil liability for volunteer health practitioners, § 12-87-111.

Tort liability — Immunity declared, § 21-9-301.

Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.

8-7-513. Apportionment of costs.

Any party found liable for any costs or expenditures recoverable under §§ 8-7-512, 8-7-514, 8-7-515, and 8-7-517 which establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that only a portion of such costs or expenditures are attributable to his or her actions shall be required to pay only for that portion.

If the trier of fact finds the evidence insufficient to establish each party's portion of costs or expenditures, the court shall apportion the costs or expenditures, to the extent practicable, according to equitable principles, among the responsible parties.

The Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund shall pay any portion of the total expenditure in excess of the aggregate amount of costs or expenditures apportioned pursuant to this section.

In any action under this section, no responsible party shall be liable for more than that party's apportioned share of the amount expended from the fund for the hazardous substance site.

The apportioned share shall be based on a responsible party's total volume of the hazardous substance at the hazardous substance site at the time of action taken under this subchapter.

Any expenditures required by the provisions of this subchapter made by a responsible party, before or after suit, shall be credited toward any apportioned share.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4719.

8-7-514. Recovery of expenditures generally.

After an expenditure from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund for a removal action or remedial action, the Division of Environmental Quality shall institute action to recover the expenditure from the person or persons liable for causing the release of the hazardous substance, including taking any appropriate legal action.

Making use of any and all appropriate existing state legal remedies, the division or the Attorney General shall act to recover the amount expended by the state for any and all remedial action or removal actions from any and all parties identified as responsible parties for each hazardous substance.

All moneys recovered from responsible parties pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the fund.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, §§ 8, 9; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-4719, 82-4720; Acts 1991, No. 516, § 3; 1999, No. 1164, § 100; 2005, No. 1824, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 2766.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

8-7-515. Recovery of expenditures — Limitations.

No person, including the state, may recover under the authority of this section for any remedial action or removal action costs or damages resulting:

From the application, in accordance with label directions of a pesticide product registered under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act; or

Solely from an act or omission of a third party or from an act of God or an act of war.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4719; 2005, No. 1824, § 12.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, referred to in this section, is codified primarily as 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq.

8-7-516. Liens for expenditures and value of improvements.

If the owner of real property that is the location of a hazardous substance site upon which remedial action or removal action is performed under this subchapter is responsible, in whole or in part, for causing the release of the hazardous substance, there shall exist a lien against the real property for the moneys expended. If the expenditure results in an increase in the value of the real property, the lien shall also be for the increase in value.

The lien shall be effective upon the filing by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality of a notice of lien with the circuit clerk in the county in which the real property is located.

The lien obtained by this section shall not exceed the amount of expenditures, as itemized on an affidavit of expenditures attached to and filed with the notice of lien, and the increase in real property value as a result of the removal action, remedial action, or abatement action taken, as determined by an independent appraisal, a copy of which shall be attached to and filed with the notice of lien.

The notice of lien shall be filed within thirty (30) days of the date of the last act performed on the real property by the Division of Environmental Quality or its agent under this subchapter.

Upon filing of the notice of lien, a copy with attachments shall be served upon the real property owner in the manner provided for enforcement of mechanics' or materialmen's liens.

Any and all moneys recovered or reimbursed pursuant to this section through voluntary agreements or court orders shall be deposited into and credited to the account of the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4720; Acts 1988 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 15, § 2; 2005, No. 1824, § 13; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2767, 2768.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b) and (d).

8-7-517. Punitive damages.

If any person who is liable for a release or threat of release of a hazardous substance fails without sufficient cause to properly provide remedial action or removal action upon order of the Division of Environmental Quality, the person may be liable to the state for punitive damages in an amount equal to three (3) times the amount of any costs incurred by the state as a result of the failure to take proper action.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4719; 2005, No. 1824, § 14; 2019, No. 910, § 2769.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-518. Fees on the generation of hazardous waste.

On or before April 1 of each year, the following persons shall report the total amount of such hazardous waste generated or accepted to the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, except as provided in this section, on forms prescribed by the Division of Environmental Quality:

Every person who generated hazardous waste in Arkansas during the preceding year; and

Every person who accepted for treatment, storage, or disposal in Arkansas during the preceding year hazardous waste generated outside the state.

Except as provided in this section, there is assessed a fee to be collected by the division upon every person who generated hazardous waste in Arkansas or who accepted hazardous waste generated outside of the state which was subsequently received for treatment, storage, or disposal in Arkansas based upon the combined total of such hazardous waste as is required to be reported pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

The fees shall be calculated and paid according to a schedule to be adopted by rule of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, not to exceed a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually per facility.

No person shall be required to pay fees based on the quantity of hazardous waste generated when such hazardous waste is managed in a totally enclosed treatment facility, an elementary neutralization unit, or a wastewater treatment unit, or when the hazardous waste is otherwise excluded by rule from inclusion in a facility's determination of its compliance status or category as a generator.

Any person who has paid such fees for hazardous waste generated in 1997 or later years shall be entitled to a refund upon application for a refund.

The division shall calculate the amount of fee refund due and provide the applicant with a copy of the calculation.

The division shall promptly pay any refund due from the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund.

On or before July 1 of each year, each person subject to subsection (a) of this section shall pay to the division the fee required by subsection (b) of this section.

To the extent practicable, the division shall coordinate the reporting requirements of this section with the reporting requirements of the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq., and the rules adopted under the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq. The content of the reporting shall be consistent with federal reporting requirements pursuant to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., in all respects with the exception of frequency.

The division shall prepare annually a statement of all revenues collected by the fees under this section, as well as all other revenues to the fund, and all expenditures from the fund and obligations of the fund and the current balance in the fund.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4718; Acts 1987, No. 380, § 1; 1999, No. 1041, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 315, §§ 634-636; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2770-2773.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(1)(B) and (b)(2)(A); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” twice in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-519. Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from any final order of the Division of Environmental Quality under this subchapter as provided in §§ 8-4-202, 8-4-210, 8-4-212—8-4-214, 8-4-218, 8-4-219, and 8-4-221 — 8-4-229 and in accordance with rules promulgated by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 479, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4724; 2005, No. 1824, § 15; 2019, No. 315, § 637; 2019, No. 910, § 2774.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-7-520. Contribution.

Any person who has undertaken or is undertaking remedial action at a hazardous substance site in response to an administrative or judicial order initiated against such person pursuant to § 8-7-508 or § 8-7-1104(d) may obtain contribution from any other person who is liable for such hazardous substance site.

Any person who has resolved all or a portion of his or her liability for a hazardous substance site by undertaking remedial action pursuant to an administrative or judicially approved settlement may obtain contribution from any person who is liable for such hazardous substance site and is not a party to the settlement.

Those persons identified under § 8-7-512(a) shall be the persons liable for the hazardous substance site.

An action for contribution may be brought in the circuit court of the county in which the hazardous substance site is located. In resolving contribution claims, the circuit court shall allocate the costs and expenses incurred or to be incurred by the contribution claimant or claimants for undertaking remedial action among all persons liable for the hazardous substance site, using such equitable factors as the circuit court determines are appropriate.

Any person who has resolved all or a portion of his or her liability for a hazardous substance site by undertaking remedial action pursuant to an administrative or judicial proceeding or settlement shall not be liable for claims for contribution regarding matters addressed in the order or settlement which have been satisfactorily resolved. Such order or settlement does not discharge any of the other persons liable for the hazardous substance site who did not undertake or participate in the remedial action, unless the terms of the order or settlement so provide.

[Repealed.]

No action for contribution may be commenced more than three (3) years after the date of the administrative or judicial order or settlement with respect to such remedial action. In any such action, the circuit court shall enter a declaratory judgment on liability that will be binding on any subsequent action to recover costs and expenses for remedial action.

In any action for contribution, judicial review of any issues concerning the adequacy of the remedial action shall be limited to the administrative record to determine whether the selected remedy contained in the order or settlement is arbitrary or capricious, and then only such costs and expenses as are found to be inconsistent with those terms of the administrative or judicial order or settlement found to be arbitrary or capricious may be disallowed.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 441, § 3; 1995, No. 125, § 3; 1997, No. 1042, § 2; 2019, No. 693, § 22.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 125, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly finds and declares as follow:

“(1)

The redevelopment of abandoned industrial sites should be encouraged as a sound land use management policy to prevent the needless development of prime farmland, open space and natural and recreation areas and to prevent urban sprawl;

“(2)

The redevelopment of abandoned industrial sites should be encouraged so that these sites can be returned to useful, tax producing properties to protect existing jobs and provide new job opportunities;

“(3)

Persons interested in redeveloping abandoned industrial sites should have a method of determining what their legal liabilities and cleanup responsibilities will be as they plan the reuse of abandoned sites;

“(4)

Incentives should be put in place to encourage prospective purchasers to voluntarily develop and implement cleanup plans of abandoned industrial sites without the use of taxpayer funds or the need for adversarial enforcement actions by the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology;

“(5)

The Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology now routinely, through its permitting policies, determines when contamination will and will not pose unacceptable risks to public health or the environment and similar concepts are used in establishing cleanup policies for abandoned industrial sites;

“(6)

Parties and persons responsible under law for pollution at industrial sites should perform remedial responses which are fully consistent with existing requirements; and

“(7)

As an incentive to promote the redevelopment of abandoned industrial sites, persons not responsible for preexisting pollution at or contamination on industrial sites should meet alternative cleanup requirements if they acquire title after fully disclosing the nature of conditions at the site and declaring and committing to a specified future land use of the site.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (f).

8-7-521. Site access for remedial or removal action.

For purposes of responding to an administrative or judicial order or settlement entered pursuant to § 8-7-508, the owner or the operator of a facility that is a hazardous substance site, or any person who otherwise controls access to such a facility, shall provide access to the Division of Environmental Quality, any employee of the division, or any other person, duly designated by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, who undertakes such activities as are required to carry out the terms of the order or settlement.

Any person who impedes or interferes with a person who is entitled to site access for the purpose of conducting remedial action or removal action at a hazardous substance site pursuant to the terms of an administrative or judicial order or settlement may be assessed a civil penalty by the division in an administrative proceeding or by the court in a judicial proceeding for a site access injunction of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day that site access is impeded.

Any person who knowingly impedes or interferes with a person who is entitled to site access for the purpose of conducting remedial action or removal action at a hazardous substance site pursuant to the terms of an administrative or judicial order or settlement shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for up to one (1) year, or both.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 441, § 3; 2005, No. 1824, § 16; 2019, No. 910, § 2775.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a) and (b).

8-7-522. Liability for actions relating to remedial actions.

No shareholder, director, or officer of a corporation or a grantor or trustee of a trust whose sole purpose, as stated in its articles of incorporation or its trust agreement, is to conduct remedial action at a hazardous substance site pursuant to an administrative or judicial order or settlement under § 8-7-508 shall be liable to any person for any action of the corporation or trust reasonably related to the stated purpose of the corporation or trust.

This section shall not apply to any action of the corporation or trust resulting from the gross negligence or intentional misconduct of a shareholder, director, or officer of said corporation, or a grantor or trustee of said trust.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the liability of any person for the hazardous substance site under this subchapter, nor shall the liability of any such person be expanded as a result of such person undertaking remedial action or serving as a shareholder, officer, or director of a corporation or as a grantor or trustee of a trust which undertakes remedial action pursuant to an administrative or judicial order or settlement under § 8-7-508.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 441, § 3.